Maine, session 132, LD424.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2001-A, sub-§2, ¶A-1, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 327, §2, is
amended to read:
A-1. A handgun carried by a person who is 21 18 years of age or older and is not
otherwise prohibited from carrying a firearm or is 18 years of age or older and under
21 years of age and is on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States or the
National Guard or is an honorably discharged veteran of the Armed Forces of the
United States or the National Guard and is not otherwise prohibited from carrying a
firearm;